Utah statutes.
13-10-5.   Exemptions.
(1) This chapter does not apply to:
(a)  any person engaged in radio or television broadcasting or cable
television who transfers, or causes to be transferred, any of the sounds
referred to in Sections 13-10-3 and 13-10-4 (other than from the sound track
of a motion picture) intended for, or in connection with, broadcast
transmission or for archival purposes; or
(b)  any person transferring any such sounds without any compensation being
derived by this person or any other person from the transfer.
(2)  This chapter shall neither enlarge nor diminish the rights of parties in
civil litigation.
